Arkansas, session 2025, HB1876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 4, Subchapter 1 is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
18-4-101. Generative artificial intelligence tool — Ownership of model
training and generated content — Work made for hire — Exceptions.
(a) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, when a
person uses a generative artificial intelligence tool to:
(1) Generate content, the person who provides the input or
directive to the generative artificial intelligence tool shall be the owner
of the generated content, provided that the content does not infringe on
existing copyrights or intellectual property rights;
(2) Conduct model training, the person who provides data or
input to train a generative artificial intelligence model shall be the owner
of the resulting trained model, provided that the:
(A) Training data is lawfully acquired; and
(B) Person has not transferred ownership rights through a
contract or agreement.
*LJH238*
04-07-2025 10:57:24 LJH238

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 H4/7/25 HB1876
(b)(1) If an individual is employed by a person or entity and is
directed to use a generative artificial intelligence tool to conduct model
training or generate content as part of his or her employment duties, the
resulting model training data and generated content shall be the property of
the individual's employer.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall apply only if the
use of the generative artificial intelligence tool is:
(A) Within the scope of the individual's employment; and
(B) Conducted under the direction and control of the
employer.
(c) This section does not grant ownership over content that infringes
on pre-existing copyrights or other intellectual property rights regardless
of the use of a generative artificial intelligence tool.

/s/R. Scott Richardson





















04-07-2025 10:57:24 LJH238